Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3522
Board; certificate of appointment; Attorney General; duties; official seal; rules and regulations.

Each member of the board shall receive a certificate of appointment from the Governor and, before beginning the term of office, shall file with the Secretary of State the constitutional oath of office. The board or any committee of the board is entitled to the services of the Attorney General in connection with the affairs of the board, and the board may compel the attendance of witnesses, administer oaths, and take testimony and proofs concerning all matters within its jurisdiction. The Attorney General shall act as legal advisor to the board and render such legal assistance as may be necessary in carrying out the Geologists Regulation Act. The board may employ counsel and necessary assistance to aid in carrying out the act. The board may adopt and have an official seal, which may be affixed to all certificates of licensure granted, and may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the act.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 70;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 19.